Utah statutes.
53A-11-1205.   Noncurricular clubs -- Annual authorization.

(1)  A noncurricular club shall have a minimum of three members.

(2)  Students proposing a noncurricular club shall submit a written application for authorization on a form approved by the school governing board.

(3)  An application for authorization of a noncurricular club shall include:

(a)  the recommended club name;

(b)  a statement of the club's purpose, goals, and activities;

(c)  a statement of the club's categorization, which shall be included in the parental consent required under Section 53A-11-1210, indicating all of the following that may apply:

(i)  athletic;

(ii)  business/economic;

(iii)  agriculture;

(iv)  art/music/performance;

(v)  science;

(vi)  gaming;

(vii)  religious;

(viii)  community service/social justice; and

(ix)  other;

(d)  the recommended meeting times, dates, and places;

(e)  a statement that the club will comply with the provisions of this part and all other applicable laws, rules, or policies; and

(f)  a budget showing the amount and source of any funding provided or to be provided to the club and its proposed use.

(4)  The application may be as brief as a single page so long as it contains the items required under this section.

(5) (a)  A school governing board may provide for approval of a noncurricular club name in an action separate from that relating to authorization of the club itself.

(b)  A school governing board shall require:

(i)  that a noncurricular club name shall reasonably reflect the club's purpose, goals, and activities; and

(ii)  that the noncurricular club name shall be a name that would not result in or imply a violation of this part.

